nb: Leires primære sammensetning: Jordleirebasert; Skumbasert; Mineralbasert; Blandet; Papirbasert; Resinbasert; Stivelsesbasert; Annen
en: Clay primary composition: Earthen clay-based; Foam-based; Mineral-based; Mixed; Paper-based; Resin-based; Starch-based; Other
hu: Agyag elsődleges összetétele: Földagyag-alapú; Habalapú; Ásványi alapú; Vegyes; Papíralapú; Gyantaalapú; Keményítőalapú; Egyéb
sl-SI: Primarna sestava gline: Na osnovi lončarske gline; Na osnovi pene; Na mineralni osnovi; Mešano; Na osnovi papirja; Na osnovi smole; Na osnovi škroba; Drugo
es: Composición primaria de la arcilla: A base de arcilla de barro; A base de espuma; A base de minerales; Mixto; A base de papel; A base de resina; A base de almidón; Otro
sk-SK: Primárne zloženie hliny: Na báze zemitej hliny; Na báze peny; Na báze minerálov; Zmiešaná; Na báze papiera; Na báze živice; Na báze škrobu; Iné
sv: Lerans primära sammansättning: Lerbaserad; Skumbaserad; Mineralbaserad; Blandad; Pappersbaserad; Hartsbaserad; Stärkelsebaserad; Annan
ru: Основной состав глины: На основе гончарной глины; На основе пены; На минеральной основе; Смешанная; На бумажной основе; На основе смолы; На основе крахмала; Другая
pl: Podstawowy skład gliny: Na bazie gliny naturalnej; Na bazie pianki; Na bazie minerałów; Mieszana; Na bazie papieru; Na bazie żywicy; Na bazie skrobi; Inna
ro-RO: Compoziția principală a argilei: Pe bază de lut de pământ; Pe bază de spumă; Pe bază de minerale; Mixt; Pe bază de hârtie; Pe bază de rășină; Pe bază de amidon; Altele
lt-LT: Pagrindinė molio sudėtis: Molio pagrindo; Putų pagrindo; Mineralų pagrindo; Mišri; Popieriaus pagrindo; Dervos pagrindo; Krakmolo pagrindo; Kita
th: องค์ประกอบหลักของดินเหนียว: ทำจากดินเหนียว; ทำจากโฟม; ทำจากแร่; ผสม; ทำจากกระดาษ; ทำจากเรซิน; ทำจากแป้ง; อื่นๆ
pt-BR: Composição primária da argila: À base de argila de barro; À base de espuma; À base de minerais; Misto; À base de papel; À base de resina; À base de amido; Outro
de: Primäre Zusammensetzung des Tons: Auf Naturtonbasis; Auf Schaumbasis; Auf Mineralienbasis; Gemischt; Auf Papierbasis; Auf Harzbasis; Auf Stärkebasis; Sonstige
hr-HR: Primarni sastav gline: Na bazi zemljane gline; Na bazi pjene; Na bazi minerala; Miješano; Na bazi papira; Na bazi smole; Na bazi škroba; Ostalo
ja: 粘土の主要成分: 土粘土ベース; フォームベース; 鉱物ベース; 混合; 紙ベース; 樹脂ベース; デンプンベース; その他
ko: 점토 주요 구성 성분: 흙 점토 기반; 폼 기반; 미네랄 기반; 혼합; 종이 기반; 레진 기반; 전분 기반; 기타
fi: Saven ensisijainen koostumus: Savipohjainen; Vaahtopohjainen; Mineraalipohjainen; Sekoite; Paperipohjainen; Hartsipohjainen; Tärkkelyspohjainen; Muu
bg-BG: Основен състав на глината: На основата на земна глина; На основата на пяна; На минерална основа; Смесена; На хартиена основа; На основата на смола; На основата на нишесте; Друго
cs: Primární složení jílu: Na bázi zemitého jílu; Na bázi pěny; Na bázi minerálů; Smíšené; Na bázi papíru; Na bázi pryskyřice; Na bázi škrobu; Jiné
pt-PT: Composição primária da argila: À base de argila; À base de espuma; À base de minerais; Misto; À base de papel; À base de resina; À base de amido; Outro
vi: Thành phần chính của đất sét: Gốc đất sét nung; Gốc xốp; Gốc khoáng vật; Hỗn hợp; Gốc giấy; Gốc nhựa (resin); Gốc tinh bột; Khác
zh-TW: 黏土主要成分: 天然陶土基底; 泡沫基底; 礦物基底; 混合; 紙基底; 樹脂基底; 澱粉基底; 其他
zh-CN: 黏土主要成分: 陶土基; 泡沫基; 矿物基; 混合; 纸基; 树脂基; 淀粉基; 其他
nl: Klei primaire samenstelling: Op basis van aardewerkklei; Op basis van schuim; Op mineralenbasis; Gemengd; Op papierbasis; Op harsbasis; Op basis van zetmeel; Anders
fr: Composition principale de l’argile: À base de terre glaise; À base de mousse; À base de minéraux; Mixte; À base de papier; À base de résine; À base d’amidon; Autre
tr: Kilin temel bileşimi: Toprak kil bazlı; Köpük bazlı; Mineral bazlı; Karışık; Kağıt bazlı; Reçine bazlı; Nişasta bazlı; Diğer
el: Πρωτογενής σύνθεση πηλού: Με βάση τον χωμάτινο πηλό; Με βάση τον αφρό; Με βάση τα ορυκτά; Μικτή; Με βάση το χαρτί; Με βάση τη ρητίνη; Με βάση το άμυλο; Άλλη
it: Composizione primaria dell'argilla: A base di argilla; A base di schiuma; A base di minerali; Misto; A base di carta; A base di resina; A base di amido; Altro
da: Lerets primære sammensætning: Naturlerbaseret; Skumbaseret; Mineralbaseret; Blandet; Papirbaseret; Resinbaseret; Stivelsesbaseret; Andet